District of Columbia statutes.
47-121

Enforcement of liability of persons certifying vouchers.

The liability of any person who certifies any voucher pursuant to the provisions of §§ 47-112, 47-120, and 47-121 shall be enforced in the same manner and to the same extent as now provided by law with respect to enforcement of the liability of disbursing and other accountable officers; and they shall have the right to apply for and obtain a decision by the Comptroller General on any question of law involved in a payment on any vouchers presented to them for verification.

History

July 30, 1951, 65 Stat. 125, ch. 246, § 4
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-112.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-121.
1973 Ed., § 47-120b.